Utah statutes.
19-2-122.   Cooperative agreements between political subdivisions and department.

(1)  Any political subdivision of the state may enter into and perform with other political subdivisions of the state or with the department contracts and agreements as they find proper for establishing, planning, operating, and financing air pollution programs.

(2)  The agreements may provide for an agency to:

(a)  supervise and operate an air pollution program;

(b)  prescribe, subject to the approval of the  board, the agency's powers and duties; and

(c)  fix the compensation of the agency's members and employees.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

